Utah statutes.
78B-2-314.   Statute of limitations -- Permanent or continuing trespass -- Damages.

In accordance with Section 78B-2-305, an action for damage created by trespass shall be brought within three years of discovery of the last trespass incident which includes a permanent or continuing trespass that caused the damage.



Enacted by Chapter 401, 2013 General Session

